Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8606
Residential contractor; furnish itemized description; contents.

Prior to commencement of repair or replacement work, a residential contractor shall furnish the insured and insurer with an itemized description of the work to be done and the materials, labor, and fees for repair or replacement of the damaged residential real estate and the total itemized amount agreed to be paid for the work to be performed, except that the description shall not limit the insured or residential contractor from identifying other goods and services necessary to complete repairs or replacement associated with a covered loss.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 33.